California statutes. Public Utilities Code
After the expiration of three years after a bond election, the board may determine, by ordinance adopted by a vote of two-thirds of all the members of the board, that any or all of the bonds authorized at the election remaining unsold shall not be issued or sold. When the ordinance takes effect, the authorization to issue those bonds shall become void.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 502.)
-------------------------------------------

103509.

Whenever the board deems that the expenditure of money for the purposes for which the bonds were authorized by the voters is impractical or unwise, it may, by ordinance adopted by a vote of two-thirds of all members of the board, so declare and call an election to be held in the district for the purpose of submitting to the qualified voters thereof the proposition of incurring indebtedness by the issuance of such bonds for some other purposes or, in the case where bonds have been sold, the proposition to use the proceeds for some other purposes. The procedure, so far as applicable, shall be the same as when a bond proposition is originally submitted.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 502.)
-------------------------------------------

103510.

The board may provide for the issuance, sale, or exchange of refunding bonds to redeem or retire any bonds issued by the district upon the terms, at the times and in the manner which it determines. Refunding bonds may be issued in a principal amount sufficient to pay all, or any part of, the principal of such outstanding bonds, the interest thereon and the premiums, if any, due upon call and redemption thereof prior to maturity, and all expenses of such refunding. The provisions of this article for the issuance and sale of bonds apply to the issuance and sale of such refunding bonds; except that (a) no election need be called or held for the purpose
 of authorizing the issuance of refunding bonds, and (b) when refunding bonds are to be exchanged for outstanding bonds the method of exchange shall be as determined by the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 502.)
-------------------------------------------

103511.

The provisions of Article 4 (commencing with Section 53500), Chapter 3, Part 1, Division 2, Title 5 of the Government Code are applicable to the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 502.)
-------------------------------------------

103512.

Any bonds which shall be issued under the provisions of this article shall be legal investment for all trust funds; for the funds of insurance companies, banks—both commercial and savings—and trust companies; and for state school funds; and whenever any money or funds may, by any law now or hereafter enacted, be invested in bonds of cities, cities and counties, counties, school districts, or other districts within the State of California, such money or funds may be invested in the bonds issued under this part, and whenever bonds of cities, cities and counties, counties, school districts, or other districts within this state may, by any law now or hereafter enacted, be
 used as security for the performance of any act or the deposit of any public moneys, the bonds issued under this part may be so used. The provisions of this article shall be in addition to all other laws relating to legal investments and shall be controlling as the latest expression of the Legislature with respect thereto.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 502.)
-------------------------------------------

103513.

If bonds are authorized that contain a provision for special taxes under subdivision (i) of Section 103500, the board may enter into such covenants as may be deemed proper to provide for issuance of additional parity bonds, the priority and pledge of special taxes and such other covenants as are customary or desirable in the issuance of any bonds payable out of special funds or necessary, convenient, or desirable to secure the bonds or tending to make them more marketable, subject to the provisions of the ordinance calling the bond election.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 502.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Revenue Bonds [103530. - 103531.]

103530.

The district may issue bonds, payable from revenue of any facility or enterprise to be acquired or constructed by the district, in the manner provided by the Revenue Bond Law of 1941 (Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 54300), Part 1, Division 2, Title 5 of the Government Code) all of the provisions of which are applicable to the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 502.)
-------------------------------------------

103531.

The district is a local agency within the meaning of the Revenue Bond Law of 1941 (Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 54300), Part 1, Division 2, Title 5 of the Government Code). The term “enterprise” as used in the Revenue Bond Law of 1941 shall, for all purposes of this part, include the system or any or all transit facilities and all additions, extensions, and improvements thereto authorized to be acquired, constructed, or completed by the district. The district may issue revenue bonds under the Revenue Bond Law of 1941 for any one or more transit facilities authorized to be acquired, constructed, or completed by the district or, in the alternative, may issue revenue
 bonds under the Revenue Bond Law of 1941 for the acquisition, construction, and completion of any one of such transit facilities. Nothing in this article shall prevent the district from availing itself of, or making use of, any procedure provided in this part for the issuance of bonds of any type or character for any of the transit facilities authorized hereunder, and all proceedings may be carried on simultaneously or, in the alternative, as the board may determine.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 502.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Equipment Trust Certificates [103550. - 103554.]

103550.

The district shall have power to purchase transit equipment such as cars, trolley buses and motorbuses, or rolling equipment, and may execute agreements, leases, and equipment trust certificates in the forms customarily used by private corporations engaged in the transit business appropriate to effect such purchase and leasing of transit equipment, and may dispose of such equipment trust certificates upon such terms and conditions as the board may deem appropriate. Payment for such equipment, or rentals therefor, may be made in installments, and the deferred installments may be evidenced by equipment trust certificates payable from any source or sources of funds
 specified in such certificates that are or will be legally available to the district; and title to such equipment shall not rest in the district until the equipment trust certificates are paid.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 502.)
-------------------------------------------

103551.

The agreement to purchase or lease may direct the vendor or lessor to sell and assign or lease the rolling equipment to a bank or trust company duly authorized to transact business in the State of California as trustee, for the benefit and security of the equipment trust certificates and may direct such trustee to deliver the rolling equipment to one or more designated officers of the district and may authorize the district to simultaneously therewith execute and deliver an installment purchase agreement or a lease of the equipment to the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 502.)
-------------------------------------------

103552.

The agreements and leases shall be duly acknowledged before a person authorized by law to take acknowledgments of deeds and in the form required for acknowledgment of deeds, and such agreements, leases, and equipment trust certificates shall be authorized by resolution of the district and shall contain such covenants, conditions, and provisions which may be deemed necessary or appropriate to insure the payment of the equipment trust certificates from legally available source or sources of funds specified in such certificates.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 502.)
-------------------------------------------

103553.

The covenants, conditions, and provisions of the agreements, leases, and equipment trust certificates shall not conflict with any of the provisions of any trust agreement securing the payment of bonds, notes, or certificates of the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 502.)
-------------------------------------------

103554.

An executed copy of each such agreement and lease shall be filed in the office of the Secretary of State, who shall be entitled to receive one dollar ($1) for each such copy filed with him and which filing shall constitute notice to any subsequent judgment creditor or any subsequent purchaser. Each vehicle so purchased or leased shall have the name of the owner or lessor plainly marked on both sides thereof followed by the appropriate words “Owner and Lessor” or “Owner and Vendor,” as the case may be.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 502.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Improvement Acts and Special Benefit Districts [103570. - 103571.]

103570.

The Improvement Act of 1911, the Municipal Improvement Act of 1913, and the Improvement Bond Act of 1915 are applicable to the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 502.)
-------------------------------------------

103571.

The provisions of Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 99000) of Part 11 of this division are applicable to the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 502.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Temporary Borrowing [103580. - 103583.]

103580.

The district may borrow money for the purpose of defraying general administrative and preliminary expenses of the district, lawfully incurred, prior to the time moneys to be raised by the first tax levy for the district are available, a sum which shall not exceed five cents ($0.05) on each one hundred dollars ($100) of assessed valuation of taxable property in the district at the time the moneys are borrowed, and to evidence such borrowing by notes bearing interest at a rate not to exceed 7 percent per annum. The notes shall be payable from the first tax levy made by the district, and the tax levy shall contain a sum sufficient to provide for the payment of the notes and
 the interest thereon. The form of the notes, and their issuance and sale, shall be governed by the applicable provisions referred to in Section 103583.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 502.)
-------------------------------------------

103581.

At any time prior to the first receipt by the district of revenues from taxation, the county may lend any available money to the district for the purposes of organization and operation. Such expenditures shall constitute a proper expenditure of county funds. Such loans may bear interest.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 502.)
-------------------------------------------

103582.

The district may borrow money in accordance with the provisions of Article 7 (commencing with Section 53820), or of Article 7.6 (commencing with Section 53850), of Chapter 4, Part 1, Division 2, Title 5 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 502.)
-------------------------------------------

103583.

The district may borrow money in anticipation of the sale of bonds which have been authorized to be issued, but which have not been sold and delivered, and may issue negotiable bond anticipation notes therefor and may renew the same from time to time, but the maximum maturity of any such notes, including the renewals thereof, shall not exceed five years from the date of delivery of such original notes. Such notes may be paid from any moneys of the district available therefor and not otherwise pledged. If not previously otherwise paid, the notes shall be paid from the proceeds of the next sale of the bonds of the district in anticipation of which they were issued and, if
 not so paid, taxes may be levied for their payment in the same manner as taxes are levied for the payment of general obligation bonds pursuant to Article 9 (commencing with Section 103340) of Chapter 5 until such bonds are issued. Such notes shall not be issued in any amount in excess of the aggregate amount of bonds which the district has been authorized to issue, less the amount of any bonds of such authorized issue previously sold, and also less the amount of other bond anticipation notes therefor issued and then outstanding. The notes shall be issued and sold in the same manner as the bonds. Such notes and the resolution or resolutions authorizing the same may contain any provisions, conditions, or limitations which a resolution of the district authorizing the issuance of bonds may contain.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 502.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Miscellaneous [103600. - 103602.]

103600.

The district may bring an action to determine the validity of any of its bonds, equipment trust certificates, warrants, notes, or other evidences of indebtedness pursuant to Chapter 9 (commencing with Section 860), Title 10, Part 2 of the Code of Civil Procedure.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 502.)
-------------------------------------------

103601.

All bonds and other evidences of indebtedness issued by the district under the provisions of this part, and the interest thereon, are free and exempt from all taxation within the State of California, except for transfer, franchise, inheritance, and estate tax.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 502.)
-------------------------------------------

103602.

Notwithstanding any other provisions of this part or any other law, the provisions of all ordinances, resolutions, and other proceedings in the issuance by the district of any bonds, bonds with a pledge of revenues, bonds for improvement districts, revenue bonds, equipment trust certificates, notes, or any and all evidences of indebtedness or liability shall constitute a contract between the district and the holders of such bonds, equipment trust certificates, notes, or evidences of indebtedness or liability, and the provisions thereof shall be enforceable against the district, or any or all of its successors or assigns, by mandamus or any other appropriate suit, action
 or proceeding in law or in equity in any court of competent jurisdiction. Nothing contained in this part or in any other law shall be held to relieve the district or the territory included within it from any bonded or other debt or liability contracted by the district. Upon dissolution of the district or upon withdrawal of territory therefrom, the property formerly included within the district, or withdrawn therefrom, shall continue to be liable for the payment of all bonded and other indebtedness or liabilities outstanding at the time of such dissolution or withdrawal the same as if the district had not been so dissolved or the territory withdrawn therefrom, and it shall be the duty of the successors or assigns to provide for the payment of such bonded and other indebtedness and liabilities. Except as may be otherwise provided in the proceedings for the authorization, issuance, and sale of any revenue bonds, bonds secured by a pledge of revenues, or bonds for improvement districts secured by a pledge of
 revenues, revenues of any kind or nature derived from any revenue-producing improvements, works, facilities, or property owned, operated, or controlled by the district shall be pledged, charged, assigned and have a lien thereon for the payment of such bonds as long as the same are outstanding, regardless of any change in ownership, operation, or control of such revenue-producing improvements, works, facilities, or property and it shall, in such later event or events, be the duty of the successors or assigns to continue to maintain and operate such revenue-producing improvements, works, facilities, or property as long as bonds are outstanding.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 502.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 8. Dissolution [103700. - 103700.]

103700.

The district may be dissolved pursuant to the provisions of the District Reorganization Act of 1965 (Division 1 (commencing with Section 56000), Title 6 of the Government Code).

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 502.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 16. SONOMA-MARIN AREA RAIL TRANSIT DISTRICT [105000. - 105337.]



  CHAPTER 1. General Provisions and Definitions [105000. - 105004.]

105000.

This part shall be known and may be cited as the Sonoma-Marin Area Rail Transit District Act.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 341, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

105001.

It is the intent of the Legislature in enacting this part to provide for a unified, comprehensive institutional structure for the ownership and governance of a passenger and freight rail system within the Counties of Marin, Napa, Solano, and Sonoma, and any other counties immediately adjacent to those counties.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 423, Sec. 25.   (SB 69)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

105002.

Unless the context otherwise requires, the provisions of this chapter govern the construction of this part.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 341, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

105003.

As used in this part, the following terms have the following meanings:

(a) “District” means the Sonoma-Marin Area Rail Transit District.

(b) “Dividing line” has the same meaning as defined in Section 93004 of the Government Code.

(c) “Rail transit” means the transportation of passengers and their incidental baggage by rail and provision of freight service by rail.

(d) “Rail transit works” or “rail transit facilities” means any or all real and personal property, equipment,
 rights, or interests owned or to be acquired by the district for rail transit service purposes, including ancillary bicycle and pedestrian pathways that provide connections between and access to station sites.

(e) “Board of directors,” “board,” or “directors” means the board of directors of the district.

(f) “Public agency” includes the state, and any county, city and county, city, district, or other political subdivision or public entity of, or organized under the laws of, this state, or any department, instrumentality, or agency thereof.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 423, Sec. 26.   (SB 69)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

105004.

The Cortese-Knox-Hertzberg Local Government Reorganization Act of 2000 (Part 1 (commencing with Section 56000) Division 3 of Title 5 of the Government Code), shall not apply to the formation or dissolution of the district, or the annexation of additional contiguous territory to the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 341, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. Formation of District [105010. - 105012.]

105010.

There is hereby created the Sonoma-Marin Area Rail Transit District, comprising the territory lying within the boundaries of the Counties of Marin and Sonoma.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 341, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

105011.

Through compliance with the provisions for annexation set forth in Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 105280), the territory of all or part of any other contiguous county may be included within the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 341, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

105012.

(a) Upon the dissolution of the Sonoma-Marin Area Rail Transit Commission and the Northwestern Pacific Railroad Authority, the district shall succeed to any or all of the powers, duties, rights, obligations, liabilities, indebtedness, bonded and otherwise, immunities, and exemptions of the commission and its board of commissioners and the authority and its board of directors.

(b) Upon the dissolution of the Sonoma-Marin Area Rail Transit Commission and the Northwestern Pacific Railroad Authority, the district shall assume the rights and obligations of the commission and the authority under any contract to which the commission or the authority
 is a party and which is to be performed, in whole or in part, on or after the date of dissolution of the Sonoma-Marin Area Rail Transit Commission and the Northwestern Pacific Railroad Authority.

(c) All real and personal property owned by the Sonoma-Marin Area Rail Transit Commission and the Northwestern Pacific Railroad Authority may be transferred to the district. Any real or personal property owned individually or jointly by the Golden Gate Bridge, Highway and Transportation District, the County of Marin, or the Marin County Transit District, or any other public agency, may be transferred to the district.

(d) Upon the dissolution of the Sonoma-Marin Area Rail Transit Commission, the district shall assume, without any condition whatsoever, all responsibilities and obligations
 previously assumed by the commission with respect to its fund transfer agreement with the Department of Transportation for the funding of the Sonoma-Marin Area Rail Transit Project.

(e) On and after the date of dissolution of the Sonoma-Marin Area Rail Transit Commission and the Northwestern Pacific Railroad Authority, any reference in any provision of law or regulation to the commission or the authority shall be deemed to refer to the district.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 866, Sec. 2.   (SB 904)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3. Government of District [105020. - 105052.]



  ARTICLE 1. Board of Directors [105020. - 105023.]

105020.

The government of the district shall be vested in a board of directors, which shall consist of 12 members, appointed as follows:

(a) Two members of the Sonoma County Board of Supervisors, each of whom shall also serve on the Board of Directors of the Sonoma County Transportation Authority, appointed by the Sonoma County Board of Supervisors.

(b) Two members of the Marin County Board of Supervisors, appointed by the Marin County Board of Supervisors.

(c) Three members, each of whom shall be a mayor or council member of a city or town within the County of Sonoma, appointed by the Mayors’ and Councilmembers’ Association
 of Sonoma County or its successor, if the following conditions are met:

(1) At least two members are also city representatives for the Sonoma County Transportation Authority.

(2) All of the members are from cities on the rail line in Sonoma County.

(3) No city has more than one member.

(d) The member of the City Council of the City of Novato who also serves on the Marin County Congestion Management Agency, appointed by the Marin County Congestion Management Agency or its successor.

(e) The member of the City Council of the City of San Rafael who also serves on the Marin County Congestion Management Agency, appointed by the Marin County Congestion Management Agency or its successor.

(f) One member, who shall be a mayor or council member of a city or town within the County of Marin and a member of the Marin County Congestion Management Agency, appointed by the Marin County Council of Mayors and Councilmembers or its successor.

(g) Two members of the Golden Gate Bridge, Highway and Transportation District, neither of whom shall be a member of the Marin or Sonoma County Boards of Supervisors, appointed by the Golden Gate Bridge, Highway and Transportation District or its successor.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2020, Ch. 370, Sec. 258.   (SB 1371)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

105021.

(a) The 12 members of the board shall serve staggered, four-year terms.

(b) Within 60 days of its occurrence, any vacancy on the board shall be filled by the body that originally made the appointment to the office in which the vacancy exists.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 341, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

105022.

The board may fix the amount of compensation to be paid to each member of the board. The compensation shall not exceed five hundred dollars ($500) in any one calendar month. Each member shall be allowed necessary traveling and personal expenses incurred in the performance of his or her duties as may be authorized by the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 341, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

105023.

In the event that new territory is annexed to the district pursuant to Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 105280), and upon the affirmative vote of a majority of directors, which shall include an affirmative vote of at least three directors from each county within the district appointed pursuant to subdivisions (a) to (f), inclusive, of Section 105020, the board may restructure the membership of the board to provide representation of the new territory on the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 341, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Powers and Duties of Board of Directors [105030. - 105033.]

105030.

The board is the legislative body of the district and, consistent with the provisions of this part, shall determine all district policy.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 341, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

105031.

The board shall select one of its members as chairperson, and another of its members as vice chairperson, who shall serve in the absence of the chairperson.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 341, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

105032.

It shall be the duty of the board and it shall have the power to:

(a) Own, operate, manage, and maintain a passenger and freight rail system within the territory of the district.

(b) Determine the rail transit and freight facilities, including ancillary bicycle and pedestrian pathways, to be acquired and constructed by the district, the manner of operation, and the means to finance them.

(c) Adopt an annual budget for the district that provides for the compensation of its officers and employees.

(d) Fix rates, rentals, charges, and classifications of rail transit and freight service operated by the district.

(e) Adopt an administrative code that prescribes the powers and duties of district officers, the method of appointment of district employees, and the methods, procedures, and systems for the operation and management of the district.

(f) Adopt rules and regulations governing the use of rail transit and freight facilities owned or operated by the district.

(g) Cause a postaudit of the financial transactions and records of the district to be made at least annually by a certified public accountant.

(h) Adopt rules and regulations providing for
 the administration of employer-employee relations.

(i) Consider potential alternatives to help address the housing needs of current and future employees.

(j) Do any and all things necessary to carry out the purposes of this part.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 423, Sec. 27.   (SB 69)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

105033.

(a) The board is authorized to establish the position of chief of police. The chief of police shall be a duly sworn peace officer who shall be appointed by the board and who shall meet the current requirements of the Commission on Peace Officer Standards and Training
 pursuant to Title 4 (commencing with Section 13500) of Part 4 of the Penal Code.

(b) If the board determines that more than one peace
 officer is needed, the board
 shall
 contract with law enforcement agencies located within the County of Marin or the County of Sonoma for the additional law enforcement services of one or more duly sworn peace officers who shall meet the current requirements of the Commission on Peace Officer Standards and Training pursuant to Title 4 (commencing with Section 13500) of Part 4 of the Penal Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 492, Sec. 1.   (SB 626)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Meetings and Legislation [105040. - 105045.]

105040.

All meetings of the board shall be conducted in the manner prescribed by the Ralph M. Brown Act (Chapter 9 (commencing with Section 54950) of Part 1 of Division 2 of Title 5 of the Government Code).

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 341, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

105041.

A majority of the board constitutes a quorum for the transaction of its business.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 341, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

105042.

The affirmative vote of a majority of the members of the board shall be necessary and, except as otherwise provided in this act, shall be sufficient to carry out any order, resolution, or ordinance coming before the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 341, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

105043.

The board shall establish rules for its proceedings and determine the place and time for its meetings.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 341, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

105044.

The acts of the board shall be expressed by motion, resolution, or ordinance.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 341, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

105045.

(a) If the district or a qualified voter initiative proposes a measure pursuant to Section 105115, the board of supervisors of the Counties of Sonoma and Marin shall call a special election on the measure in their respective counties. The special election may be consolidated with a statewide election and the measure shall be submitted to the voters of the Counties of Sonoma and Marin.

(b) The district shall reimburse the Counties of Sonoma and Marin upon request for the incremental cost of submitting a measure to
 the voters pursuant to subdivision (a). These costs shall be reimbursed from revenues derived from the measure if it is approved by the voters, or, if the measure is not approved, from any existing revenues administered by the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 866, Sec. 3.   (SB 904)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Other Officers [105050. - 105052.]

105050.

The board shall appoint a general manager for the district. The board may appoint a secretary, a chief engineer, a legal counsel, a controller, an auditor, a treasurer, and other officers, assistants, and deputies, as the board may deem necessary and provide for by ordinance. These officers shall serve at the pleasure of the board. The offices of auditor, controller, and treasurer may be held by separate officers or combined and held by one officer.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 341, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

105051.

The Counties of Marin and Sonoma, the Golden Gate Bridge, Highway and Transportation District, or any other public agency may render assistance to the district as it may require, including the performance by officers of the counties, the Golden Gate Bridge, Highway and Transportation District, or other public agency of the functions of legal counsel, controller, auditor, and treasurer. The district shall reimburse the counties, the Golden Gate Bridge, Highway and Transportation District, or other public agency for the services performed by them for the
 district.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 341, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

105052.

The powers and duties of the general manager are:

(a) To head the administrative branch of the district and to be responsible to the board for the proper administration of all affairs of the district.

(b) To appoint, supervise, suspend, or remove district officers, other than members of the board and officers appointed by the board.

(c) To supervise and direct the
 preparation of the annual budget for the board and to be responsible for its administration after its adoption.

(d) To formulate and present to the board plans for rail transit facilities within the district and the means to finance them.

(e) To supervise the planning, acquisition, construction, maintenance, and operation of the rail transit facilities of the district.

(f) To attend meetings of the board.

(g) To prepare and submit to the board, as soon as practicable after the end of each fiscal year, a complete report of the finances and administrative activities of the district for the preceding year.

(h) To perform other and additional duties as the board may require.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 341, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 4. Powers and Functions of the District [105060. - 105126.]



  ARTICLE 1. Corporate Powers [105060. - 105062.]

105060.

The district has perpetual succession and may adopt a seal and alter it at its pleasure.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 341, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

105061.

The district may sue and be sued, except as otherwise provided by law, in all actions and proceedings, in all courts and tribunals of competent jurisdiction.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 341, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

105062.

All claims for money or damages against the district are governed by Division 3.6 (commencing with Section 810) of Title 1 of the Government Code, except as provided herein, or by other statutes or regulations expressly applicable thereto.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 341, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Contracts [105070. - 105076.]

105070.

The district may make contracts and enter into stipulations of any nature whatsoever, employ labor, and do all acts necessary and convenient for the full exercise of the powers granted in this part.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 341, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

105071.

No officer or employee of the district shall in any manner be interested, directly or indirectly, in any contract awarded or to be awarded by the board, or in the profits to be derived therefrom, contrary to the provisions of Article 4 (commencing with Section 1090) of Chapter 1 of Division 4 of Title 1 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 341, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

105072.

The district may insure against any accident or destruction of the rail transit system or any part thereof. The district may insure against loss of revenues from any cause whatsoever. In proceedings authorizing the issuance of any bonds, the district may provide for the carrying of insurance in an amount and of a character as may be specified, and may provide for the payment of premiums thereon. The district may also provide insurance as provided in Part 6 (commencing with Section 989) of Division 3.6 of Title 1 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 341, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

105073.

The district may contract for the services of independent contractors.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 341, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

105074.

For purposes of entering into design-build contracts, the district is a “transit operator” within the meaning of Article 6.8 (commencing with Section 20209.5) of Chapter 1 of Part 3 of Division 2 of the Public Contract Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 341, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

105075.

The district is a local agency for purposes of the Natural Disaster Assistance Act, Chapter 7.5 (commencing with Section 8680) of Division 1 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 341, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

105076.

The district shall be considered the succeeding agency to the “Sonoma-Marin Area Rail Transit Authority” for the purpose of receiving funds available under paragraph (30) of subdivision (a) of Section 14556.40 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 341, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Property [105085. - 105088.]

105085.

The district may take by grant, purchase, devise, or lease, or condemn in proceedings under eminent domain, or otherwise acquire, and hold and enjoy, real property of every kind within or without the district necessary to the full or convenient exercise of its powers. The board may lease, mortgage, sell, or otherwise dispose of any real or personal property when in its judgment it is in the best interests of the district to do so.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 341, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

105086.

The district may exercise the right of eminent domain to take any property necessary or convenient to the exercise of the powers granted in this act. The district, in exercising that right, shall, in addition to the damage for the taking, injury, or destruction of property, also pay the cost, exclusive of betterment and with credit for salvage value, of removal, reconstruction, or relocation of any substitute facilities, including structures, railways, mains, pipes, conduits, wires, cables or poles of any public utility which is required to be moved to a new
 location.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 341, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

105087.

(a) The district may take by gift, or take or convey by grant, purchase, devise, or lease, and hold and enjoy, real and personal property of every kind within or without the district necessary for, incidental to, or convenient for, transit-oriented joint development projects that meet the definition and requirement set forth in subdivision (b).

(b) (1) For purposes of this section, a “transit-oriented joint development project” is a commercial,
 residential, or mixed-use development that is undertaken in connection with existing, planned, or proposed intermodal transit facilities and is located one-fourth mile or less from the external boundaries of that facility.

(2) Any transit-oriented joint development project created under this section shall comply with the land use and zoning regulations of the city, county, or city and county in which the project is located.

(c) The authority granted under this section extends to any joint powers agency of which the district is a member and for which the district serves as the managing agency.

(d) The district may not exercise its power of eminent domain in order to make an acquisition under this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 341, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

105088.
